Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-882
Public-offering statement filed with Securities and Exchange Commission; effect.

If an interest in a condominium is currently registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission of the United States, a declarant satisfies all requirements relating to the preparation of a public-offering statement of the Nebraska Condominium Act if he or she delivers to the purchaser a copy of the public-offering statement filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. An interest in a condominium is not a security under the Securities Act of Nebraska.

Laws 1983, LB 433, § 58;

Laws 2002, LB 857, § 5.

Securities Act of Nebraska, see section 8-1123.